Tennessee, session 114, HB0917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-2-114(b)(2), is amended by
deleting subdivision (C) and substituting:
(C) The space requirements are special and unique as determined and
approved by the state building commission; or
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0917
001241
- 1 -